Missouri, session 2026, HB3.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
There is appropriated out of the State Treasury, to be expended only as provided in
Article IV, Section 28 of the Constitution of Missouri, for the purpose of funding each
department, division, agency, fund transfer, and program described herein for the item or items
stated, and for no other purpose whatsoever, chargeable to the fund designated for the period
beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, as follows:
PART 1
Section 3.000. Each appropriation in this act shall consist of the item
or items in each section of Part 1 of this act, for the amount and
purpose and from the fund designated in each section of Part 1,
as well as all additional clarifications of purpose in Part 2 of this
act that make reference by section to said item or items in Part 1.
Any clarification of purpose in Part 2 shall state the section or
sections in Part 1 to which it attaches and shall, together with the
language of said section(s) in Part 1, form the complete statement

CCS SCS HCS HB 3 2
of purpose of the appropriation. As such, the provisions of Part
2 of this act shall not be severed from Part 1, and if any
clarification of purpose in Part 2 is for any reason held to be
invalid, such decision shall invalidate all of the appropriations in
this act of which said clarification of purpose is a part. Part 3 of
this act shall consist of guidance to the Department Higher
Education & Workforce Development and public institutions of
higher education in implementing the appropriations found in
Part 1 and Part 2 of this act. An appropriation may be comprised
in whole or in part of a one-time amount, and such one-time
amount shall be construed to be a component part of, and not in
addition to, the stated appropriation amount. Any amount of an
appropriation identified as “one-time” in this act shall not be
considered an addition to any ongoing core appropriation(s) in
future fiscal periods beyond June 30, 2026. Any amount
identified as one-time may, however, be requested in any future
fiscal period as a new decision item.
Section 3.005. To the Department of Higher Education and Workforce
Development
For Higher Education Coordination and for grant and scholarship
program administration, provided five percent (5%) flexibility is
allowed between personal service and expense and equipment,
and further provided three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed
from this section to Section 3.150
Personal Service .............................................................................................$5,792,064
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 649,803
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................6,441,867
Personal Service ....................................................................................................49,411
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 16,850
From Department of Higher Education Out-of-State Program Fund
(1420) ....................................................................................................................66,261
For workshops and conferences sponsored by the Department of Higher
Education and Workforce Development, and for distribution of
federal funds to higher education institutions, to be paid for on a
cost-recovery basis, and for returning unspent grant funds to the
original grantor organization

CCS SCS HCS HB 3 3
From Quality Improvement Revolving Fund (1537) ........................................... 75,000
Total (Not to exceed 58.63 F.T.E.) ............................................................................$6,583,128
Section 3.013. To the Department of Higher Education and Workforce
Development
For the department to use a third-party vendor contract to develop a
statewide campaign to reach, reengage, and support some
college, no credential population in the state
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) .......................................................$1,000,000
Section 3.015. To the Department of Higher Education and Workforce
Development
For regulation of proprietary schools as provided in Section 173.600,
RSMo
Personal Service ....................................................................................................$8,643
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 65,602
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ................................................................................74,245
Personal Service ..................................................................................................279,465
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 92,522
From Proprietary School Certification Fund (1729) .......................................................371,987
For the initial and ongoing costs to the department associated with the
closure of proprietary schools, provided twenty-five percent
(25%) flexibility is allowed between personal service and
expense and equipment
Personal Service
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..................................................................................1,668
Personal Service ....................................................................................................53,797
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 100,000
From Proprietary School Bond Fund (1760) ....................................................... 153,797
Total (Not to exceed 5.00 F.T.E.) .................................................................................$601,697
Section 3.020. To the Department of Higher Education and Workforce
Development
For indemnifying individuals as a result of improper actions on the part
of proprietary schools as provided in Section 173.612, RSMo
From Proprietary School Bond Fund (1760) ................................................................$200,000

CCS SCS HCS HB 3 4
Section 3.025. To the Department of Higher Education and Workforce
Development
For annual membership in the Midwestern Higher Education Compact
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$122,057
Section 3.030. To the Department of Higher Education and Workforce
Development
For receiving and expending donations and federal funds, provided that
the General Assembly shall be notified of the source of any new
funds and the purpose for which they shall be expended, in
writing, prior to the expenditure of said funds and further
provided that no funds shall be used to implement or support the
Common Core Standards
From Department of Higher Education and Workforce Development
Fund (1116) .......................................................................................................$500,000
Section 3.035. To the Department of Higher Education and Workforce
Development
For receiving and expending donations and funds other than federal
funds, provided that the General Assembly shall be notified of
the source of any new funds and the purpose for which they shall
be expended, in writing, prior to the expenditure of said funds
and further provided that no funds shall be used to implement or
support the Common Core Standards
From State Institutions Gift Trust Fund (1925) .........................................................$1,000,000
Section 3.040. To the Department of Higher Education and Workforce
Development
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the
Academic Scholarship Fund, provided three percent (3%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 3.150
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$24,726,666
From State Institutions Gift Trust Fund (1925) ................................................... 2,000,000
Total .........................................................................................................................$26,726,666
Section 3.045. To the Department of Higher Education and Workforce
Development
For the Higher Education Academic Scholarship Program pursuant to
Chapter 173, RSMo

CCS SCS HCS HB 3 5
From Academic Scholarship Fund (1840) ...............................................................$29,076,666
Section 3.050. To the Department of Higher Education and Workforce
Development
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the Access
Missouri Financial Assistance Fund, provided three percent (3%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 3.150
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$73,371,052
From Missouri Student Grant Program Gift Fund (1272) ................................................50,000
From State Institutions Gift Trust Fund (1925) ................................................... 2,000,000
Total .........................................................................................................................$75,421,052
Section 3.055. To the Department of Higher Education and Workforce
Development
For the Access Missouri Financial Assistance Program pursuant to
Chapter 173, RSMo
From Access Missouri Financial Assistance Fund (1791) ......................................$83,960,000
Section 3.060. To the Department of Higher Education and Workforce
Development
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the A+
Schools Fund, provided three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed
from this section to Section 3.150
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$58,313,326
From State Institutions Gift Trust Fund (1925) ................................................... 2,000,000
Total .........................................................................................................................$60,313,326
Section 3.065. To the Department of Higher Education and Workforce
Development
For the A+ Schools Program, provided that any institution with enrolled
students receiving such funds shall provide sufficient data to the
Department of Higher Education and Workforce Development
necessary for the department to submit year-end information
which shall be delivered to the General Assembly by the
department detailing data about the distribution and utilization of
such funds to students, including the number of students who
receive a zero award due to federal and other state aid
From A+ Schools Fund (1955) ................................................................................$61,900,000

CCS SCS HCS HB 3 6
Section 3.070. To the Department of Higher Education and Workforce
Development
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the Fast
Track Workforce Incentive Grant Fund, provided three percent
(3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 3.150
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$5,700,000
From Lottery Proceeds Fund (1291) .................................................................... 1,000,000
Total ...........................................................................................................................$6,700,000
Section 3.075. To the Department of Higher Education and Workforce
Development
For the Fast Track Workforce Incentive Grant Program, provided that
any Fast Track Workforce Incentive Grant toward a scholarship
at a private four-year institution is limited to not more than the
in-state tuition and fees for the University of Missouri-Columbia,
and further provided that any Fast Track Workforce Incentive
Grant toward a scholarship at a private two-year institution is
limited to not more than the in-state tuition, fees, and charges at
a most comparable program at any Missouri two-year public
community college or the State Technical College of Missouri
From Fast Track Workforce Incentive Grant Fund (1488) ........................................$8,000,000
Section 3.080. To the Department of Higher Education and Workforce
Development
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the Dual
Credit Scholarship Fund, provided three percent (3%) flexibility
is allowed from this section to Section 3.150
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$7,000,000
Section 3.085. To the Department of Higher Education and Workforce
Development
For providing reimbursements to eligible underserved students pursuant
to Section 173.2505, RSMo, and for providing reimbursement of
dual enrollment or outstanding dual credit costs of eligible
students participating in coursework pursuant to Section
173.2505, RSMo
From Dual Credit Scholarship Fund (1541) ..............................................................$7,000,000

CCS SCS HCS HB 3 7
Section 3.090. To the Department of Higher Education and Workforce
Development
For Advanced Placement grants for Access Missouri Financial
Assistance Program and A+ Schools Program recipients
From AP Incentive Grant Fund (1983) .........................................................................$100,000
Section 3.095. To the Department of Higher Education and Workforce
Development
For the Public Service Officer or Employee Survivor Grant Program
pursuant to Section 173.260, RSMo, provided three percent (3%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 3.150
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$273,500
Section 3.100. To the Department of Higher Education and Workforce
Development
For the Veterans’ Survivors Grant Program pursuant to Section 173.234,
RSMo, provided three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from
this section to Section 3.150
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$495,000
Section 3.103. To the Department of Higher Education and Workforce
Development
For the Missouri Returning Heroes Program
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$1,386,596
Section 3.105. To the Department of Higher Education and Workforce
Development
For the Kids’ Chance Scholarship Program pursuant to Chapter 173,
RSMo
From Kids’ Chance Scholarship Fund (1878) ................................................................$22,000
Section 3.110. To the Department of Higher Education and Workforce
Development
For the Minority and Underrepresented Environmental Literacy Program
pursuant to Section 173.240, RSMo, provided three percent (3%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 3.150
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................$36,964
Section 3.115. To the Department of Higher Education and Workforce
Development

CCS SCS HCS HB 3 8
For the Missouri Guaranteed Student Loan Program
From Guaranty Agency Operating Fund (1880) ...........................................................$640,001
Section 3.137. To the Department of Higher Education and Workforce
Development
For a social work pilot program located in a city with more than seventy-
one thousand but fewer than seventy-nine thousand inhabitants,
provided that program eligibility is limited to Missouri residents
with a minimum of sixty hours toward an approved bachelors
program leading to a degree in social work or a minimum of six
hours towards an approved masters of social work; and further
provided grants shall be awarded up to the cost of course work
tuition and general fees; and further provided no more than five
percent of this subsection can be used to market the grant
program and no more than ten percent of this subsection can be
used to offset institutional costs for clinical placement and site
visits
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$300,000
Section 3.138. To the Department of Higher Education and Workforce
Development
For enhancements to a nursing program at a public institution of higher
education located in a city with more than fifty-one thousand but
fewer than fifty-eight thousand inhabitants and located in more
than one county
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) ..........................................................$150,000
Section 3.141. To the Department of Higher Education and Workforce
Development
For a statewide program designed to increase collaboration and
workforce opportunities via industry partnership in precision
health and agricultural sciences
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$2,300,000
Section 3.150. To the Department of Higher Education and Workforce
Development
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury, for the
payment of claims, premiums, and expenses as provided by

CCS SCS HCS HB 3 9
Section 105.711 through 105.726, RSMo, to the State Legal
Expense Fund
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................................$1
Section 3.200. To the Department of Higher Education and Workforce
Development
For the Division of Workforce Development
For general administration of Workforce Development activities,
provided ten percent (10%) flexibility is allowed between
personal service and expense and equipment
Personal Service ................................................................................................$817,764
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 2,161,242
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................2,979,006
Personal Service .............................................................................................14,315,786
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 3,284,962
From Job Development and Training Fund (1155) ...................................................17,600,748
For the Show-Me Heroes Program
From Show-Me Heroes Fund (1995) ................................................................... 500,000
Total (Not to exceed 333.62 F.T.E.) ........................................................................$21,079,754
Section 3.205. To the Department of Higher Education and Workforce
Development
For funding for persons with autism through a contract with a Southeast
Missouri organization concentrating on the maximization of
giftedness, workforce transition skills, independent living skills,
and employment support services, provided three percent (3%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 3.150
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$300,000
Section 3.206. To the Department of Higher Education and Workforce
Development
For a program located in a county with more than one million inhabitants
that helps students navigate the college admissions and financial
aid process
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) ..........................................................$100,000
Section 3.210. To the Department of Higher Education and Workforce
Development

CCS SCS HCS HB 3 10
For the Certified Work Ready Community Program, provided three
percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to Section
3.150
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$100,000
For a statewide, competitively bid virtual education program to provide
high school students with career-focused virtual education
pathways and industry recognized credentials for in-demand
industry sectors
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................1,459,000
For an organization located in a city with more than four hundred
thousand inhabitants and located in more than one county to
provide education curriculum, training, access to capital, and
mentoring
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................350,000
For a non-profit organization, located in any city not within a county, to
provide cost-free education, training and apprenticeships for
computer programming
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................1,000,000
For a non-profit organization, located in any city with more than thirty-
six thousand five hundred but fewer than forty thousand
inhabitants and any city with more than one hundred sixty
thousand but fewer than two hundred thousand inhabitants, to
provide cost-free education, training and apprenticeships for
computer programming
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) .........................................................2,000,000
For a Pre-Apprenticeship program within any city not within a county to
assist minorities and women in the preparation for entry into
construction contractor sponsored apprenticeship programs by
providing curriculum that teaches core competencies the student
will need before applying for a construction position
From Job Development and Training Fund (1155) ........................................................300,000
For a Pre-Apprenticeship program to assist minorities and women in the
preparation for entry into construction contractor sponsored
apprenticeship programs by providing curriculum that teaches

CCS SCS HCS HB 3 11
core competencies the student will need before applying for a
construction position
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) ............................................................300,000
For a historic local national organization, located within a city with more
than four hundred thousand inhabitants and located in more than
one county, which enables disadvantaged persons to obtain self-
sufficiency through job training and entrepreneurship
From Job Development and Training Fund (1155) ........................................................100,000
For a Workforce Pre-Apprenticeship training in a city with more than
four hundred thousand inhabitants and located in more than one
county to assist minorities and women, work-based learning
opportunities for youth who are pursuing careers immediately
after high school in the preparation for entry into construction
contractor sponsored apprenticeship programs, information
technology, culinary arts and food service management, by
providing curriculum that teaches core competencies the student
will need before applying for a construction position; and for
work readying programs which enable women and minorities to
obtain self-sufficiency through job training
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) .........................................................2,000,000
For the acquisition, renovation, planning, design, equipment, furniture,
programs, and services for a non-profit organization established
in 2018, to provide training for inmates released from prison,
young people in Family Court Division, veterans, and others with
an opportunity to enter a pre-apprenticeship program to receive
construction skills, math, blueprint reading, workplace
interpersonal skills, goal setting, financial literacy, conflict
resolution, entrepreneurship, and job certifications that is located
in any city with more than four hundred thousand inhabitants and
located in more than one county, provided that local matching
funds must be provided on a 90/10 state/local basis
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) .........................................................2,500,000
To an existing high quality pre-apprenticeship program that is a
bridge to direct entry into a United States Department of Labor
approved skilled trades apprenticeship program

CCS SCS HCS HB 3 12
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) ............................................................500,000
For a non-profit organization located in any city with more than forty
thousand but fewer than fifty-one thousand inhabitants and
partially located in a county with more than seventy thousand but
fewer than eighty thousand inhabitants for a construction,
manufacturing, and healthcare workforce program that operates
statewide and serves historically underrepresented individuals
gain entry into a joint contractor and labor-sponsored registered
apprenticeship by teaching comprehensive core competencies
and providing national and state industry-recognized credentials
that help the individual become employed in a construction,
manufacturing, and healthcare position
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) ............................................................400,000
For job training and related activities
From Job Development and Training Fund (1155) ...................................................34,595,665
From Special Employment Security Fund (1949) .......................................................1,000,000
For administration of programs authorized and funded by the United
States Department of Labor, such as Trade Adjustment
Assistance (TAA), and provided that all funds shall be expended
from discrete accounts and that no monies shall be expended for
funding administration of these programs by the Division of
Workforce Development
From Job Development and Training Fund (1155) ............................................. 2,451,857
Total .........................................................................................................................$49,056,522
Section 3.215. To the Department of Higher Education and Workforce
Development
For promoting, developing, and expanding registered apprenticeships,
including registered apprenticeships and pre-apprenticeships
within industry sectors or occupations
Personal Service ................................................................................................$131,263
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 2,883,009
From Job Development and Training Fund (1155) (Not to exceed 2.25
F.T.E.) ............................................................................................................$3,014,272
Section 3.220. To the Missouri University of Science and Technology

CCS SCS HCS HB 3 13
For phased expansion of Project Lead the Way in ten (10) southern
Missouri counties provided this funding serves as state match for
federal funding, and provides pilot support for Project Lead the
Way in a city with more than one thousand nine hundred but
fewer than two thousand one hundred fifty inhabitants and that is
the county seat of a county with more than twenty-two thousand
but fewer than twenty-five thousand inhabitants and a county
with more than thirty-five thousand but fewer than forty thousand
inhabitants and with a county seat with more than five thousand
but fewer than eight thousand inhabitants in affiliation with
Missouri University of Science and Technology
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$250,000
Section 3.400. To the Department of Higher Education and Workforce
Development
For distribution to community colleges as provided in Section 163.191,
RSMo, provided three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from
this section to Section 3.150
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .....................................................................$158,810,531
From Lottery Proceeds Fund (1291) ..........................................................................10,489,991
For distribution to community colleges for the purpose of equity
adjustments
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................10,044,016
For maintenance and repair at community colleges, local matching funds
must be provided on a 50/50 state/local match rate in order to be
eligible for state funds
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................4,396,718
For the payment of refunds set off against debt as required by Section
143.786, RSMo
From Debt Offset Escrow Fund (1753) ............................................................... 3,000,000
Total .......................................................................................................................$186,741,256
Section 3.402. To the Department of Higher Education and Workforce
Development
For Mineral Area Community College

CCS SCS HCS HB 3 14
For expansion of an industry and technology program, provided that
local matching funds must be provided on a 50/50 state/local
basis
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) .......................................................$5,000,000
Section 3.403. To the Department of Higher Education and Workforce
Development
For Metropolitan Community College
For capital improvements for an automotive training program, provided
that local matching funds must be provided
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) .......................................................$2,000,000
Section 3.405. To the State Technical College of Missouri, provided
three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to
Section 3.150
All Expenditures
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (including $500,000 one-time) .......................$9,571,816
From Lottery Proceeds Fund (1291) ...............................................................................536,217
For the payment of refunds set off against debt as required by Section
143.786, RSMo
From Debt Offset Escrow Fund (1753) ............................................................... 32,000
Total .........................................................................................................................$10,140,033
Section 3.410. To the University of Central Missouri, provided three
percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to Section
3.150
All Expenditures
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$62,610,582
From Lottery Proceeds Fund (1291) ............................................................................6,050,959
For the payment of refunds set off against debt as required by Section
143.786, RSMo
From Debt Offset Escrow Fund (1753) ............................................................... 325,000
Total .........................................................................................................................$68,986,541
Section 3.415. To Southeast Missouri State University, provided three
percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to Section
3.150
All Expenditures

CCS SCS HCS HB 3 15
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$51,988,317
From Lottery Proceeds Fund (1291) ............................................................................4,935,757
For a non-profit organization that enable all young people to reach their
full potential as productive, caring and responsible citizens, for a
building located in any city with more than three thousand four
hundred but fewer than three thousand eight hundred inhabitants
and located in a county with more than twenty-five thousand but
fewer than thirty thousand inhabitants and with a county seat with
more than eight thousand but fewer than twelve thousand
inhabitants
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) .........................................................1,000,000
For the payment of refunds set off against debt as required by Section
143.786, RSMo
From Debt Offset Escrow Fund (1753) ............................................................... 275,000
Total .........................................................................................................................$58,199,074
Section 3.420. To Missouri State University, provided three percent (3%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 3.150
All Expenditures
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .....................................................................$106,959,899
From Lottery Proceeds Fund (1291) ............................................................................9,670,119
For the establishment and implementation of a statewide science and
engineering fair to promote STEM education and workforce
development, with funding to support the following: (a) the
creation of a statewide competition hosted by Missouri State
University, providing opportunities for students to qualify for the
Regeneron International Science and Engineering Fair (ISEF);
(b) expansion and support of regional science fairs to increase
access for students, particularly those in underserved areas,
ensuring equitable participation; (c) training and resources for
teachers to effectively mentor students in STEM research
projects; and (d) operational funding for the host institution to
contract with an entity to manage the state fair and provide
support to regional fairs
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) ............................................................600,000

CCS SCS HCS HB 3 16
For the payment of refunds set off against debt as required by Section
143.786, RSMo
From Debt Offset Escrow Fund (1753) ............................................................... 750,000
Total .......................................................................................................................$117,980,018
Section 3.425. To Lincoln University, provided three percent (3%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 3.150
All Expenditures
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$22,276,873
From Lottery Proceeds Fund (1291) ............................................................................1,814,072
For the purpose of funding the 1890 land grant match .............................................10,145,500
For the purpose of funding the 1890 institutional support ................................... 2,849,342
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................12,994,842
For the payment of refunds set off against debt as required by Section
143.786, RSMo
From Debt Offset Escrow Fund (1753) ............................................................... 200,000
Total .........................................................................................................................$37,285,787
Section 3.430. To Truman State University, provided three percent (3%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 3.150
All Expenditures
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$47,113,083
From Lottery Proceeds Fund (1291) ............................................................................4,576,165
For the Greenwood Interprofessional Autism Center
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) ............................................................575,000
For the payment of refunds set off against debt as required by Section
143.786, RSMo
From Debt Offset Escrow Fund (1753) ............................................................... 200,000
Total .........................................................................................................................$52,464,248
Section 3.435. To Northwest Missouri State University, provided three
percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to Section
3.150
All Expenditures
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$35,350,837
From Lottery Proceeds Fund (1291) ............................................................................3,342,740

CCS SCS HCS HB 3 17
For the payment of refunds set off against debt as required by Section
143.786, RSMo
From Debt Offset Escrow Fund (1753) ............................................................... 250,000
Total .........................................................................................................................$38,943,577
Section 3.440. To Missouri Southern State University, provided three
percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to Section
3.150
All Expenditures
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$29,777,717
From Lottery Proceeds Fund (1291) ............................................................................2,431,511
For the payment of refunds set off against debt as required by Section
143.786, RSMo
From Debt Offset Escrow Fund (1753) ............................................................... 200,000
Total .........................................................................................................................$32,409,228
Section 3.445. To Missouri Western State University, provided three
percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to Section
3.150
All Expenditures
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$25,207,910
From Lottery Proceeds Fund (1291) ............................................................................2,394,327
For the payment of refunds set off against debt as required by Section
143.786, RSMo
From Debt Offset Escrow Fund (1753) ............................................................... 325,000
Total .........................................................................................................................$27,927,237
Section 3.450. To Harris-Stowe State University, provided three percent
(3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 3.150
All Expenditures
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$11,830,631
From Lottery Proceeds Fund (1291) ............................................................................1,148,979
For the design and implementation of the Urban Policing Program to
provide students real world law enforcement practice and de-
escalation and anti-bias training for officers throughout Missouri
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................500,000

CCS SCS HCS HB 3 18
For the payment of refunds set off against debt as required by Section
143.786, RSMo
From Debt Offset Escrow Fund (1753) ............................................................... 200,000
Total .........................................................................................................................$13,679,610
Section 3.455. To the University of Missouri
For operation of its various campuses and programs
All Expenditures
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .....................................................................$251,656,079
From Lottery Proceeds Fund (1291) ..........................................................................46,842,748
For the purpose of funding the federal match requirement and the
statewide operations in the areas of the Agricultural Extension
Service
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................30,541,168
For the purpose of delivering first professional doctorate degrees in
Medicine, Veterinary Medicine, Dentistry, Pharmacy, and
Optometry
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................112,499,936
For research and development operations of the State’s public research
university
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................84,910,192
For the Greenley Research Center for research related to the “Water
Works for Agriculture in Missouri” initiative
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................275,000
For the Fisher Delta Research Center
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................1,000,000
For the University of Missouri School of Law Veterans Clinic
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................500,000
For the Fisher Delta Research Center for the Rice Breeders Association
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................120,000
For the payment of refunds set off against debt as required by Section
143.786, RSMo
From Debt Offset Escrow Fund (1753) ............................................................... 1,400,000

CCS SCS HCS HB 3 19
Total .......................................................................................................................$529,745,123
Section 3.460. To the University of Missouri
For a program designed to increase international collaboration and
economic opportunity located at the University of Missouri – St.
Louis
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$1,550,000
For matching funds for a federal grant for a center located at the
University of Missouri - St. Louis to assist startups in developing
defense medicine technologies to meet the needs of U.S. military
and security forces
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................600,000
For matching funds for a federal grant for a center located at the
University of Missouri – St. Louis to promote prevention, cure,
and recovery from outbreaks of infectious disease and other
health-related crises
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ................................................................... 250,000
Total ...........................................................................................................................$2,400,000
Section 3.465. To the University of Missouri
For the Missouri Telehealth Network, provided three percent (3%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 3.150
All Expenditures
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$437,640
For the purpose of creating and implementing up to eight (8) Extension
for Community Healthcare Outcomes Programs. Four (4) of the
programs shall focus on Hepatitis, Diabetes, Chronic Pain
Management, and Childhood Asthma
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ................................................................... 1,500,000
Total ...........................................................................................................................$1,937,640
Section 3.470. To the University of Missouri
For a program of research into spinal cord injuries
All Expenditures
From Spinal Cord Injury Fund (1578) .......................................................................$1,500,000
Section 3.475. To the University of Missouri

CCS SCS HCS HB 3 20
For the treatment of renal disease in a statewide program, provided three
percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to Section
3.150
All Expenditures
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$1,750,000
Section 3.480. To the University of Missouri
For the State Historical Society, provided three percent (3%) flexibility
is allowed from this section to Section 3.150
All Expenditures
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (including $117,950 one-time) .......................$4,800,622
Section 3.485. To the Board of Curators of the University of Missouri
For use by the University of Missouri pursuant to Sections 172.610
through 172.720, RSMo
From State Seminary Moneys Fund (1623) ..................................................................$275,000
PART 2
Section 3.2005. To the Department of Higher Education and Workforce
Development and public institutions of higher education
In reference to all sections in Part 1 of this act:
No funds shall be expended at public institutions of higher
education that offer a tuition rate to any student with an unlawful
immigration status in the United States that is less than the tuition
rate charged to international students.
Section 3.2010. To the Department of Higher Education and Workforce
Development and public institutions of higher education
In reference to all sections in Part 1 of this act:
No scholarship funds shall be expended on behalf of students
with an unlawful immigration status in the United States.
PART 3
Section 3.3005. To the Department of Higher Education and Workforce
Development and public institutions of higher education
In reference to all sections in Part 1 of this act:

CCS SCS HCS HB 3 21
No state funding shall be used for contracts, programs, or
positions within institutions of higher education that are focused
solely on diversity, equity, and inclusion, or similar initiatives.
“Diversity, equity, and inclusion” includes: any effort to
manipulate or otherwise influence the composition of the faculty
or student body with reference to race, sex, color, or ethnicity
apart from ensuring colorblind and sex-neutral admissions and
hiring in accordance with state and federal antidiscrimination
laws, any effort to promote differential treatment of or provide
special benefits to individuals solely on the basis of race, color,
or ethnicity, any effort to promote or promulgate policies and
procedures designed or implemented with reference to race,
color, or ethnicity and any effort to promote or promulgate
employment trainings, programming, or activities related to race,
color, ethnicity, gender identity, or sexual orientation, except
those specifically and exclusively related to ensuring legal
compliance with state and federal law.
Bill Totals
General Revenue Fund (67.53 F.T.E.) ................................................................$1,286,930,357
Federal Funds (325.97 F.T.E.) ...................................................................................59,062,542
Other Funds (6.00 F.T.E.) .................................................................................... 106,590,631
Total (399.50 F.T.E.) ..........................................................................................$1,452,583,530
